Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1642
Authorization to operate or agent's permit; bond or agreement; when required.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, authorization to operate and an agent's permit shall be suspended by operation of law when the school or agent is no longer covered by a surety bond or agreement as required by sections 85-1639 and 85-1640. The commissioner shall cause the school or agent, or both, to receive at least thirty days' written notice prior to the release of the surety to the effect that the authorization or permit shall be suspended by operation of law until another surety bond or agreement is filed in the same manner and like amount as the bond or agreement being terminated. After the Tuition Recovery Cash Fund initially reaches the minimum fund level prescribed in section 85-1656, the surety bond or agreement provided for in section 85-1639 shall no longer be required to be kept in force by any private postsecondary career school contributing to the fund except as specified for any private postsecondary career school applying for authorization to operate from the commissioner or any other agency after September 9, 1993.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 45;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2845;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 42;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 52.